src/noun-myv-morph.txt
+Gen+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2антьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1шкантьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1шка%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Gen+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>ньсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Ela+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>стэсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Ine+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>сэсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Prl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>Г2асе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Comp+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>шкасе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Abe+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>втемесе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Tra+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>кссе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Tra+LV+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>ксэсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;

!This requires a twolc rule that will [ с с:0 > с ] SLoss
LEXICON klass-N-Derivation
 osh-N-Derivation ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ela+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossстО1%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+SLoss+Ine+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>SLossсО1%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
